Tennessee statutes. Title 46 Cemeteries
Part 1

General Provisions

46-1-101. Application — Short title — Penalty.

This chapter applies to all cemeteries, community and public mausoleums, whether operated for profit or not for profit, within this state, except cemeteries exempt under § 46-1-106. Cemeteries existing on or after January 1, 2007, shall be operated in accordance with this chapter and chapter 2 of this title, which together shall be known and may be cited as the “Cemetery Act of 2006.” The chapter also applies to all contracts executed subsequent to January 1, 2007.

Unless otherwise specified, any person violating this chapter commits a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1968, ch. 557, § 1; 1973, ch. 272, § 1; T.C.A., § 46-101; Acts 1986, ch. 693, § 3; 1989, ch. 591, § 1; 2006, ch. 1012, § 2.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Penalty for failure to account for funds, § 46-1-407.

Penalty for failure to maintain improvement care fund, § 46-1-304.

Penalty for trespass or injury to cemetery property, § 46-1-313.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Cemeteries, §§ 3, 8.

46-1-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter and chapter 2 of this title, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Cemetery” means any land or structure in this state dedicated to and used, or intended to be used, for interment of human remains;

“Cemetery company” means an individual, partnership, corporation, or association, now or hereafter organized, owning or controlling cemetery lands or property and conducting the business of a cemetery;

“Cemetery merchandise” means personal property sold by a cemetery company, such as foundations, markers, memorials, memorial bases, monuments, urns, vases, and lawn and mausoleum crypts;

“Cemetery operator” means any owner, director, principal, manager, member, stockholder with a majority ownership interest, or other person who has any ownership interest in, or has any control over, the financial operations of a cemetery company;

“Cemetery purposes” means all things requisite or necessary for, or incident or convenient to, the establishment, maintenance, management, operation, improvement and conduct of a cemetery, the preparation of the premises for interment and the interment of the human dead, and the care, preservation and embellishment of cemetery property;

“Columbarium” means a structure, room or space in a building or structure used, or intended to be used, for the interment of cremated human remains;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of commerce and insurance;

“Commodity” includes, but is not limited to, memorials consisting of permanent monuments or gravemarkers of marble, granite or bronze, bronze plaques, or bronze vases, and foundations or footings of the memorials. “Commodity” does not include floral arrangements and plants;

“Consumer price index” means the consumer price index (all items-United States city average), as published by the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics;

“Crypt” means a chamber of sufficient size to inter the remains of a deceased person;

“General fund” means the sum total of specific funds placed in a single fund;

“Human remains” or “remains” means the body of a deceased person, including the body in any stage of decomposition, and cremated remains;

“Improvement care” means the continual maintenance of the cemetery grounds and graves in keeping with a properly maintained cemetery, including cutting of grass, raking and cleaning of cemetery plots at reasonable intervals, and pruning of shrubs and trees; memorial care of commodities; procuring, maintaining and keeping in workable condition the machinery, tools and equipment needed for the shop and replacing the machinery, tools and equipment when necessary; keeping in repair and preserving the drains, water lines, roads, buildings, fences and other structures, including cemetery-owned statues and embellishments of general character applicable to the cemetery as a whole or a particular area; and paying of insurance premiums and maintaining necessary records of lot ownership, burials and other necessary information and making the records available to public authorities and interested persons;

“Interment” means any lawful disposition of the remains of a deceased person as provided by law;

“Interment right” means the right to inter human remains in a particular space in a cemetery, including, but not limited to a grave space, mausoleum crypt, niche, memorial bench, or scattering garden;

“Lawn crypts” means pre-installed, below-the-ground concrete chambers, either single or double depth, covered by earth or sod;

“Lot” or “grave space” means a space of ground in a cemetery used or intended to be used for interment, the beautification of the ground, or the memorialization of the deceased person;

“Mausoleum crypts” means chambers contained in a structure or building constructed of reinforced concrete, whether assembled above or below ground;

“Memorial care” includes, but is not limited to, resetting or straightening tipped commodities, replacing damaged commodities, and providing for the general maintenance of commodities;

“Niche” means a space in a columbarium used, or intended to be used, for the interment of the cremated remains of one (1) or more deceased persons;

“Pre-need” means the time prior to death when the use of cemetery merchandise or services is not actually required;

“Services” means acts performed by a cemetery company on its premises in the final interment of human remains or the installation of cemetery merchandise used in connection with final interment;

“Specific funds” means funds identified with cemetery merchandise to be delivered, or services to be performed, as specified in a certain contract and earmarked as having been paid by a certain purchaser; and

“Undeveloped” means real property that is not presently suitable for interment, entombment or inurnment as described in the purchase agreement.

Acts 1968, ch. 557, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 137, § 1; Acts 1979, ch. 307, § 2; T.C.A., § 46-102; Acts 1980, ch. 780, §§ 1, 2; 2006, ch. 1012, § 2; 2009, ch. 356, § 6; 2015, ch. 288, § 1; 2016, ch. 911, §§ 15, 16.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Cemeteries, §§ 2, 8.

46-1-103. Certificate of registration — Temporary permit.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, it is a Class A misdemeanor for any cemetery company to operate a cemetery or separate geographical site of a cemetery in this state without a valid certificate of registration for the cemetery or separate site of the cemetery.

An application for registration shall be submitted on the form prescribed by the commissioner. The applicant shall provide on such form:

The location of the cemetery, or separate site of the cemetery;

The name and address of the cemetery company, and, if a corporation, the date of incorporation;

Proof of having established improvement care and pre-need merchandise and services trust funds in accordance with this chapter;

Proof of a map showing all interment sites that will be available for sale and developed or planned for development upon approval of the application; and

Other information that the commissioner may reasonably require.

Upon approval of the application and receipt of a filing fee as set by the commissioner, the commissioner shall issue a certificate of registration to the applicant.

No certificate of registration is transferable.

Upon receipt of a satisfactory application on the prescribed form, the commissioner may issue a temporary permit authorizing operation of a cemetery, if the commissioner determines that:

No cemetery company holds a valid certificate of registration for the cemetery;

No cemetery company has submitted a sufficient application for a certificate of registration for the cemetery; and

Issuance of the temporary permit would be clearly in the public interest.

A temporary permit is subject to the conditions and limitations that the commissioner may set forth.

The commissioner may, upon request, extend the duration of a temporary permit. In no case, however, shall a temporary permit authorize continuous operation of a cemetery for longer than one (1) year.

The commissioner may terminate a temporary permit at any time, by giving written notice to the holder at least ten (10) days before the effective date of the termination.

Acts 1968, ch. 557, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 137, § 1; Acts 1973, ch. 272, §§ 2, 3; 1976, ch. 773, § 1; 1979, ch. 307, § 3; T.C.A., § 46-103; Acts 1986, ch. 693, §§ 1, 4; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6, 113; 1992, ch. 922, § 2; 2006, ch. 1012, § 2.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

46-1-104. Renewal of certificate.

All certificates of registration issued by the commissioner under this chapter expire at the end of the registrant's fiscal year following issuance of the certificate, and become invalid after that date, unless renewed.

Renewal of a certificate of registration may be effected at any time during the two (2) months preceding the date of expiration, upon submission of an application to the commissioner on the prescribed form, accompanied by a renewal fee as set by the commissioner.

The fee for late renewal for certificates of registration shall be increased by an amount as set by the commissioner for each month or fraction of a month that payment for renewal is delayed. No renewal application will be accepted later than nine (9) months after the expiration date of a certificate.

The fee for reinstatement of a nonrenewed certificate of registration shall be set by the commissioner.

Acts 1968, ch. 557, § 1; 1973, ch. 272, § 4; 1979, ch. 307, § 3; T.C.A., § 46-104; Acts 1986, ch. 693, § 5; 1992, ch. 922, §§ 3-5; 2006, ch. 1012, § 2.

46-1-105. Cemetery consumer protection account.

There is established within the state general fund a cemetery consumer protection account. All funds received by the commissioner under this section shall be deposited into the account and held solely for the purposes of this section.

Moneys within the account shall be invested by the state treasurer in accordance with § 9-4-603 for the sole benefit of the account.

No renewal of a certificate of registration shall be issued unless the applicant pays, in addition to the renewal fee, a consumer protection fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) for every pre-need sales contract entered into during the preceding renewal period, except that the applicant shall not have to pay the consumer protection fee on any pre-need sales contract entered into that was subsequently cancelled prior to the applicant's request for renewal of a certificate of registration. If the pre-need sales contract covers both cemetery merchandise and funeral merchandise as defined in § 62-5-403, then the cemetery company shall pay only one (1) consumer protection fee for the contract, which shall be credited to the cemetery consumer protection account.

One-half (½) of the funds received pursuant to this section shall be used to fund the cemetery registration program, and one-half (½) of the funds received pursuant to this section shall be used to fund any receivership action initiated by the commissioner against a cemetery due to a deficiency in the cemetery's improvement care or pre-need merchandise and services trust fund.

Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 2; 2015, ch. 288, § 2; 2016, ch. 911, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 46-1-105 (Acts 1968, ch. 523, § 1 (17.05); 1968, ch. 557, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 137, § 1; 1976, ch. 773, § 2; T.C.A., § 46-105; Acts 1986, ch. 693, §§ 1, 6), concerning requirements for organization, improvement care fund deposit, was transferred to § 46-1-203 by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 2, effective January 1, 2007.

46-1-106. Exemptions.

This chapter and chapter 2 of this title do not apply to:

Cemeteries owned by municipalities;

Cemeteries owned by churches, associations of churches, or church governing bodies;

Cemeteries owned by religious organizations;

Family burial grounds; or

Cemeteries owned by general welfare corporations created by special act of the general assembly; provided, that the cemeteries are not operated for profit and no funds of the cemeteries are used or expended, directly or indirectly, to compensate a sales contractor, sales manager or promoter of the cemetery; provided, that nothing in this subdivision (a)(5) shall prevent a cemetery owned by a church, association of churches or church governing body that has owned the cemetery for a period of five (5) years, and has operated the cemetery for religious purposes and not for profit during the period, from compensating a sales manager, sales contractor or promoter.

The commissioner has the discretion to extend this exemption to community cemeteries, after taking into consideration the intent of this chapter and the following factors, including, but not limited to:

The age of the cemetery;

The remaining area for future use;

The sale of lots over the preceding ten (10) years; and

The population of the community normally served by the cemetery.

The commissioner may at any time revoke any exemption granted a community cemetery under this authority.

Acts 1968, ch. 557, § 1; 1972, ch. 617, § 1; 1973, ch. 272, § 5; 1979, ch. 142, § 1; T.C.A., § 46-106; Acts 1986, ch. 693, §§ 7, 8; 2006, ch. 1012, § 2.

Cross-References. Ownership by Knights of Pythias lodge, § 48-102-301.

Ownership by Masonic lodges, § 48-102-202.

Ownership by religious societies, §§ 66-2-201, 66-2-203.

Ownership by veterans' organizations, § 48-102-401.

46-1-107. Sale or transfer.

No later than thirty (30) days prior to the sale or transfer of any cemetery required to be registered by this chapter, or the sale or transfer of a controlling interest in the cemetery company that owns the cemetery, the transferor shall notify the commissioner in writing, and:

Submit any documentation or records the commissioner may require in order to determine the amount of any indebtedness of the transferor to the pre-need merchandise and services trust account or the improvement care trust fund; and

Disclose any agreements between the transferor and transferee regarding:

Any existing cemetery trust accounts established pursuant to this chapter; and

Assumption or disclaimer of liabilities of the transferor.

Except as provided in subsection (c), the transferee shall not be entitled to a certificate of registration for the cemetery until:

Subsection (a) has been complied with; and

Any indebtedness of the transferor to the pre-need merchandise and services trust account or the improvement care trust fund has been liquidated.

Notwithstanding indebtedness of the transferor to the pre-need merchandise and services trust account or the improvement care trust fund, the commissioner may issue a certificate of registration to the transferee, if the commissioner determines that:

The sale or transfer is in the best interests of the maintenance and continued operation of the cemetery;

The sale or transfer is not designed to circumvent this chapter; and

The transferee has satisfactorily agreed to liquidate the indebtedness to the maximum feasible extent.

The state may, for the benefit of the pre-need merchandise and services trust account or the improvement care trust fund:

Recover from the transferor all sums that the transferor has not properly accounted for and paid into the fund; and

Recover from the transferee all sums that the transferee has not properly accounted for and paid into the fund.

The issuance of a certificate of registration under this section shall not operate to release any person, firm or corporation from any obligations to the pre-need merchandise and services trust account or the improvement care trust fund.

Acts 1973, ch. 272, § 6; 1977, ch. 147, § 1; T.C.A., § 46-107; Acts 1986, ch. 693, §§ 2, 9; 2003, ch. 81, §§ 1-5; 2006, ch. 1012, § 2.

Cross-References. Improvement care trust fund, title 46, ch. 1, part 2.

46-1-108. Purchase and subdivision of land — Sale of lots — Approval of location for cemetery use — Purchase contract — Attachment or levy of execution.

A cemetery company has the power to purchase land, not exceeding two hundred (200) acres, to be used as a cemetery forever, to lay the land off in suitable avenues or walks and embellish with trees, shrubbery, and flowers, and to subdivide the land into lots suitable for graves, monuments, and vaults, and sell the lots in the manner that the board of directors of the cemetery determines; provided, that any land may be purchased and used as a cemetery at any place within a town or city after the proposed location has been approved by resolution of the governing body of the town or city.

Each contract for the sale of burial space or the conveyance of interment rights shall be executed in duplicate, and an executed copy shall be given to the purchaser.

If a specific interment site is selected by the purchaser at the time the purchase contract is executed, the contract shall contain a detailed description of the location of the interment site purchased. All such contracts must also contain the following or similar notices to the purchaser:

“This cemetery is regulated by the State of Tennessee Department of Commerce and Insurance Burial Services Section. The purchaser or the purchaser's designated legal agent has the right upon request to access the cemetery's records relating to the purchaser's interment right or interment site. Within ninety (90) days of the receipt of the final payment on the purchase contract for any interment right, the purchaser shall receive from the cemetery company proof of ownership of that interment right. The purchaser, at the purchaser's own cost, may record a copy of such proof of ownership with the register of deeds for the county in which the cemetery is located.”

All lots sold to purchasers pursuant to subsection (c) shall forever be free from attachment or the levy of an execution.

Acts 1875, ch. 142, § 9; 1895, ch. 131, § 1; 1899, ch. 277, § 1; Shan., § 2181; Acts 1919, ch. 195, § 1; Code 1932, § 3919; Acts 1968, ch. 557, §§ 2, 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 46-101, 46-102; T.C.A., §§ 46-201, 46-202; Acts 1984, ch. 585, § 1; 1986, ch. 693, § 10; T.C.A. §§ 46-2-101, 46-2-102; Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 46-1-108 (Acts 1992, ch. 922, § 1; 1994, ch. 875, § 1; 2003, ch. 81, § 6), concerning powers and duties of commission and the cemetery advisory board, was transferred to § 46-1-301 by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 2, effective January 1, 2007.

Cross-References. Business tax, § 67-4-708.

Property tax exemption, § 67-5-214.

46-1-109. Receiving and holding of grants and bequests.

A cemetery company may hold any grant or bequest in money or other property, and shall faithfully apply the grants or bequests for the improvements of the cemetery, or in the erection or preservation of any tomb or monument, according to the terms of the grant or bequest, except those funds required to be held in trust, or paid into the improvement care trust fund as provided by § 46-1-204.

No cemetery company shall accept any special grant or bequest, unless it is in writing and made a part of the permanent records of the cemetery.

Acts 1875, ch. 142, § 9; Shan., § 2184; Code 1932, § 3922; Acts 1968, ch. 557, §§ 2, 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 46-103; 1976, ch. 773, § 3; T.C.A., § 46-203; T.C.A. § 46-2-103; Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 46-2-103 was transferred to this section by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 2, effective January 1, 2007.

46-1-110. Sale of land not suitable or needed for cemetery purposes.

Cemetery companies owning lands never actually used by them for cemetery purposes, and that are not suitable or adapted to such purpose, or are found by them to be not needful for such purposes, are empowered to sell and convey or otherwise dispose of the lands for secular or general use; provided, that:

No later than thirty (30) days prior to the disposition of the land, the cemetery company notifies the commissioner in writing and obtains written approval of the disposition from the commissioner or the commissioner's designee; and

The commissioner may order the cemetery company disposing of the land to deposit up to one hundred percent (100%) of the net proceeds of the disposition in the cemetery's improvement care trust fund or the cemetery's pre-need merchandise and services trust fund, or both, within thirty (30) days after the disposition, if there is a deficiency in either trust fund. The order may not exceed the actual amount of the deficiency in the improvement care trust fund or the pre-need merchandise and services trust fund, or both.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize cemetery companies to acquire any lands for the purpose of selling the land or to engage in speculation of real estate.

Acts 1907, ch. 94, § 1; Shan., § 2185a1; Code 1932, § 3936; Acts 1968, ch. 557, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 46-104; T.C.A., § 46-204; T.C.A. § 46-2-104; Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 46-2-104 was transferred to this section by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 2, effective January 1, 2007.

46-1-111. Records.

A record shall be kept of every burial in the cemetery of the cemetery company, showing the date of burial and name of the person buried, together with the designation of lot or space in which the burial was made. In addition, the cemetery company shall keep records showing the date of the sale, the contract number, the name of the purchaser, and the amount of the sale to be held for inclusion in the improvement care trust fund and the date of the receipt of any payment on the sale, all on a form approved by the commissioner. The cemetery company shall also keep records showing the full amount received for installation of each commodity and the full amount deposited into the improvement care trust fund for memorial care of each commodity, identified by lot owner and decedent occupying the grave space. The identical information is required if deposits to the improvement care trust fund are made on a collection basis. All sales records, trust fund records, accounting records, and all other records of the cemetery company shall be available at its principal place of business or principal office in this state, and shall be readily available at all reasonable times for examination or inspection by the commissioner or the commissioner's authorized representatives.

A record shall be kept of every interment site or interment right sold to a consumer. The record required under this section shall contain a detailed description of the location of the interment site or interment right sold.

Any consumer purchasing an interment site or interment right in a cemetery located in this state shall receive from the cemetery company at the time of purchase a copy of the executed purchase contract. If a specific interment site is selected by the consumer at the time the purchase contract is executed, the contract shall contain a detailed description of the location of the interment site purchased.

After January 1, 2007, all cemetery companies applying for and obtaining a new registration in accordance with § 46-1-103 shall develop and maintain a map of the cemetery detailing the location of interment sites. For all cemetery companies registered January 1, 2007, a map must be developed and maintained for all interment sites newly developed or planned for development before the sites may be made available for sale to consumers.

All records required to be kept under this section shall be considered as part of the cemetery, and shall be included in any sale or transfer of the cemetery. All burial and interment rights records, including copies of contracts for the sale of lots, shall be retained indefinitely. All other records shall be retained for at least ten (10) years, unless the commissioner approves a shorter period of retention.

Acts 1927, ch. 75, § 13; mod. Code 1932, § 3935; Acts 1961, ch. 44, § 1; 1968, ch. 557, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 46-105; Acts 1976, ch. 773, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 46-205, 46-2-105; Acts 1980, ch. 780, § 3; 1986, ch. 693, § 11; T.C.A., § 46-2-201; Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 46-2-201 was transferred to this section by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 2, effective January 1, 2007.

46-1-112. Correction of error in interment or in the assignment of an interment right.

When a cemetery operator has actual knowledge either of an incorrect interment or of an error in the assignment of an interment right, a cemetery operator shall have the right to correct such error pursuant to this section.

For purposes of this section, “interment” and “interment right” mean the same as defined in § 46-1-102.

When a cemetery operator has knowledge that the interment of human remains has occurred in the wrong burial location in the cemetery, the cemetery operator shall make all reasonable efforts to contact and to give notice to any known family or next of kin of the deceased person who has been incorrectly interred. If the cemetery operator reaches a family member or the next of kin, then the cemetery operator shall document the method of reaching that family member in writing and shall document the date, time and substance of the notice to the family member. If the cemetery operator cannot contact the next of kin, the cemetery operator shall make all reasonable efforts to give notice by certified mail, in advance of any corrective action, to any known family or next of kin at the last known address of such family and shall make all reasonable efforts to give notice by certified mail, in advance of any corrective action, to the owner of the burial plot in question. After the cemetery operator sends the certified mail, the cemetery operator shall wait five (5) business days before moving the person wrongfully interred.

Immediately after contacting and notifying a family member or the next of kin or after waiting five (5) business days after mailing notice via certified mail to any known family or next of kin, the cemetery operator:

May disinter the burial container wrongfully interred without a state or local permit;

Shall identity the burial container; and

Shall reinter the burial container in the proper burial space in the same cemetery.

At the time specified for a disinterment and reinterment, the cemetery operator shall allow the nearest known next of kin, and if requested, the owner of the burial space, to witness the disinterment and reinterment.

The cemetery operator shall bear all costs of the disinterment and reinterment.

The cemetery operator shall notify the commissioner of the error, the interment in the wrong location and any evidence supporting the decision that it was a wrongful interment, the steps taken pursuant to this section to remedy the wrongful interment, including, but not limited to, the efforts to reach the next of kin and any other information so required by the department, within three (3) business days after reinterment.

The cemetery operator shall also notify the commissioner of health, on a form prescribed by the commissioner, of the error, the interment in the wrongful location, the disinterment of the deceased person and the steps taken pursuant to this section to remedy the wrongful interment, including, but not limited to, the efforts to reach the next of kin pursuant to this section, within three (3) business days after the reinterment.

When the cemetery operator follows the approved procedures set forth in this section for correcting a wrongful burial due to human error in recording ownership of an interment right, or due to human error in the burial, the cemetery company, its employees and its board of directors or officers shall be held harmless and not liable for any damages directly related to the disinterment and reinterment of the deceased person who had been interred in the wrong burial location unless the cemetery company, its employees or its board of directors or officers acted intentionally or with malice in the wrongful interment. This hold harmless provision shall not extend to any action other than an action arising out of the disinterment and reinterment governed by this section.

Acts 2009, ch. 356, § 1.

46-1-113. [Repealed.]

Acts 2016, ch. 997, § 1; repealed by its own terms, effective July 1, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Former subsection (k) provided that any moneys remaining in the fund on July 1, 2019 shall revert to the general fund.